Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6013
Resident, defined.

Resident shall mean any person domiciled, residing, or receiving care and treatment, for a period in excess of twenty-four hours, in a nursing home.

Laws 1983, LB 235, § 6.